Massachusetts, session 194th, SD3244.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the Bristol County Sheriff’s
Department shall establish a sick leave bank for Jonathan Cadigan, an employee of the Sheriff’s
Department. Any employee of the Sheriff's Department may voluntarily contribute 1 or more
sick, personal or vacation days to the sick leave bank for use by Jonathan Cadigan. If Jonathan
Cadigan terminates employment with the Sheriff’s Department or requests to dissolve the sick
leave bank, any remaining time in the sick leave bank shall be transferred to the extended illness
leave bank. Sick leave bank days shall not be used for absences unrelated to the illness or
disability that necessitated the establishment of the sick leave bank as determined by the
Sheriff’s Department.
of 1